ubung2/Backs_lexc.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+Noun +Pl +Sg +masc +fem

! Italian noun stems
LEXICON Root
libr noun_male;
alber noun_male;
negozi noun_male;
film noun_male;
sedi noun_female;
speranz noun_female;
cicatric noun_female_e_ending;
pont noun_male_e_ending;


LEXICON noun_male
+Noun+Sg+masc:o # ;
+Noun+Pl+masc:i # ;
+Noun+Pl+masc:0 # ;

LEXICON noun_female
+Noun+Sg+fem:a # ;
+Noun+Pl+fem:e # ;

LEXICON noun_female_e_ending
+Noun+Sg+fem:e # ;
+Noun+Pl+fem:i # ;

LEXICON noun_male_e_ending
+Noun+Sg+masc:e # ;
+Noun+Pl+masc:i # ;
